Washington statutes.
RCW 18.210.005

Findings—Purpose—Prohibition.

(1) In order to safeguard life, health, and property and to promote the public welfare, the legislature finds that it is in the public interest to permit the limited practice of engineering by qualified individuals who are not registered as professional engineers under chapter 18.43 RCW. The increased complexity of on-site wastewater treatment systems, changes in treatment technology, and the need to protect groundwater and watershed areas make it essential that qualified professionals design the systems. Furthermore, the legislature finds that individuals who have been authorized by local health jurisdictions to design on-site wastewater treatment systems have performed these designs in the past. However, it is desirable to establish a statewide licensing program to create uniform application of design practices, standards for designs, individual qualifications, and consistent enforcement efforts applicable to all persons who design on-site wastewater treatment systems, including persons licensed to practice as professional engineers under chapter 18.43 RCW. It is further desirable to establish a certification program applicable to all persons who inspect or approve on-site wastewater treatment systems on behalf of a local health jurisdiction.

(2) It is unlawful for any individual to practice or offer to practice the design of on-site wastewater treatment systems unless licensed in accordance with this chapter or licensed as a professional engineer under chapter 18.43 RCW.

[ 1999 c 263 s 1.]